Oklahoma, session 2025, SB808.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 887.17, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 887.17. A. 1. Except for workers’ compensation
claims, any person licensed under the Physical Therapy Practice Act
as a physical therapist shall be able to including, but not limited
to, a licensed physical therapist operating under a direct-to-
employer contract, may evaluate and treat human ailments by physical
therapy on a patient without a referral from a licensed health care
practitioner for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days. Treatment
may be provided by a physical therapist assistant under the
supervision of a physical therapist. Any treatment provided beyond
the thirty-day period shall be only under the referral of a person
licensed as a physician or surgeon with unlimited license, or the
physician assistant of the person so licensed, and Doctors of
Dentistry, Chiropractic and Podiatry doctors of dentistry,
chiropractic, and podiatry and an Advanced Practice Registered
Nurse, with those referrals being limited to their respective areas
of training and practice.

2. A physical therapist may provide services within the scope
of physical therapy practice without a physician referral to
children who receive physical therapy services pursuant to the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004, as
may be amended, and Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973,
as may be amended. Provided further, a plan of care developed by a
person authorized to provide services within the scope of the
Physical Therapy Practice Act shall be deemed to be a prescription
for purposes of providing services pursuant to the provisions of the
Individuals with Disabilities Education Improvement Act of 2004, as
may be amended, and Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973,
as may be amended.
3. Nothing in the Physical Therapy Practice Act shall prevent a
physical therapist from performing screening and educational
procedures within the scope of physical therapy practice without a
physician referral.
4. Nothing in the Physical Therapy Practice Act shall prevent a
physical therapist from performing services that are provided for
the purpose of fitness, wellness, or prevention that is not related
to the treatment of an injury or ailment.
5. Nothing in the Physical Therapy Practice Act shall be
construed as authorization for a physical therapist or physical
therapist assistant to practice any branch of the healing art.
6. Any person violating the provisions of the Physical Therapy
Practice Act shall be guilty of a misdemeanor as per Section 887.16
of this title.
B. 1. The provisions of the Physical Therapy Practice Act are
not intended to limit the activities of persons legitimately engaged
in the nontherapeutic administration of baths, massage, and normal
exercise.
2. The Physical Therapy Practice Act shall not prohibit
students who are enrolled in schools of physical therapy approved by
the State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision from performing
such work as is incidental to their course of study; nor shall it
prevent any student in any recognized school of the healing art in
carrying out prescribed courses of study;, provided such school is a
ENR. S. B. NO. 808 Page 2

recognized institution by the statutes of Oklahoma Statutes, and its
practitioners are duly licensed as prescribed by law.
3. Nothing in the Physical Therapy Practice Act shall apply to
any person employed by an agency, bureau, or division of the federal
government while in the discharge of official duties; however, if
such individual engages in the practice of physical therapy outside
the line of official duty, the individual must be licensed as herein
provided.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 808 Page 3

Passed the Senate the 11th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 808 Page 4